Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 6

Mandatory Outpatient Treatment

33-6-601. Disclosure of patient information relating to outpatient treatment.

IF

a person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance was committed involuntarily under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, AND

the hospital staff determines preliminarily that:

the person will need to participate in outpatient treatment on discharge, and

there is a likelihood that the discharge will be subject to the outpatient treatment obligation of this part, AND

the person refuses to give consent to disclose information that is legally confidential under this title to the proposed outpatient qualified mental health professional,

THEN

the hospital and qualified mental health professional may exchange information as necessary to carry out this part.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 4; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 19, 20, 22; T.C.A., § 33-615; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 24, 25; 1985, ch. 437, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-6-201(a); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 6, §§ 33-6-101 — 33-6-111; 33-6-201 — 33-6-209; 33-6-301 — 33-6-306 (Acts 1957, ch. 288, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 127, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1963, ch. 315, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 37-40, 43, 45, 46; 1967, ch. 44, § 1; 1967, ch. 58, § 1;1973, ch. 127, § 11; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 43, 45, 46, 52, 53; 1975, ch. 199, §§ 1-3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 14, 16-18; 1976, ch. 610, § 1; 1976, ch. 763, § 5; 1976, ch. 764, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 165, § 1; 1977, ch. 386, § 2; 1977, ch. 449, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 527, §§ 5, 6; 1980, ch. 621, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 25-27; 1981, ch. 445, § 1; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(21); 1981, ch. 536, § 1; 1982, ch. 862, § 1, 3-11; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 8, 9, 11, 13, 14, 17-22, 24; T.C.A., § 33-314, 33-325, 33-603, 33-601, 33-604, 33-606 — 33-609, 33-614 — 33-619; 33-379 — 33-381, 33-1301 — 33-1305, 33-3-620 — 33-3-622, 33-6-203 — 33-6-205; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 8, 11-16, 23-25, 27, 28-32, 39, 40; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 14-25; 1985, ch. 478, § 37; Acts 1986, ch. 595, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 836, §§ 4, 6; 1987, ch. 145, § 26; 1988, ch. 862, §§ 1-5; 1988, ch 953, § 8; 1989, ch. 99, § 1; 1989, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 3, 15-17; 1990, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 893, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 991, §§ 15, 16; 1993, ch. 356, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 376, §§ 1-4; 1994, ch. 676, § 1; 1994, ch. 779, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 57-66; 2000, ch. 947, § 6), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

33-6-602. Release from hospitalization subject to outpatient treatment.

IF

on the basis of a review of the person's history before and during hospitalization, the hospital staff concludes that:

the person has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance or has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance in remission,

the person's condition resulting from mental illness or serious emotional disturbance is likely to deteriorate rapidly to the point that the person will pose a likelihood of serious harm under § 33-6-501 unless treatment is continued,

the person is likely to participate in outpatient treatment with a legal obligation to do so,

the person is not likely to participate in outpatient treatment unless legally obligated to do so, and

mandatory outpatient treatment is a suitable less drastic alternative to commitment,

THEN

the person shall be eligible for discharge subject to the obligation to participate in any medically appropriate outpatient treatment, including, but not limited to, psychotherapy, medication, or day treatment, under a plan approved by the releasing facility and the outpatient qualified mental health professional.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 4; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 19, 20, 22; T.C.A., § 33-615; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 24, 25; 1985, ch. 437, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-6-201(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Law Reviews.

One Fell Through the Cracks: Why Tennessee Needs an Initial Outpatient Commitment Statute (Lori R. Holyfield), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 221 (2011).

33-6-603. Outpatient treatment plan.

In developing the plan, the releasing facility and the outpatient qualified mental health professional shall consult with the service recipient; the service recipient's parents, legal custodian, or legal guardian if the service recipient is a child; and the service recipient's conservator, if any. Subject to obtaining any necessary consent before making a disclosure of patient information relating to outpatient treatment, the releasing facility and the outpatient qualified mental health professional may also consult with the service recipient's spouse or other adult family member with whom the service recipient would live concerning the outpatient treatment plan. Before approving the outpatient treatment plan, the releasing facility and the outpatient qualified mental health professional shall obtain the service recipient's consent to the plan to the extent practical and shall obtain the consent of the service recipient's parents, legal custodian, or legal guardian if the service recipient is a child.

The releasing facility shall provide a clear written statement of what the service recipient shall do to stay in compliance with the plan to the service recipient; the service recipient's parents, legal custodian, or legal guardian if the service recipient is a child; the service recipient's spouse or other adult family member with whom the service recipient would live; and the service recipient's conservator. If the service recipient is a child, the statement shall specify the duties of the service recipient's parents, legal custodian, or legal guardian.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 4; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 19, 20, 22; T.C.A., § 33-615; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 24, 25; 1985, ch. 437, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-6-201; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 659, § 1.

33-6-604. Review of plan.

IF

the person requests judicial review of the treatment plan within forty-eight (48) hours after being advised of the person's eligibility for release under it,

THEN

the hospital shall notify the court where the hospital is located that has the same jurisdiction as the committing court that the person is eligible for discharge, subject to the obligation to participate in outpatient treatment under the plan agreed to by the releasing facility and the outpatient qualified mental health professional, AND

the court shall hold a hearing within seven (7) days of receipt of the request to determine whether the treatment plan is medically appropriate and legally permissible, AND

the court shall either approve the plan or approve the plan as modified by the releasing facility and the outpatient qualified mental health professional to correct deficiencies found by the court.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 4; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 19, 20, 22; T.C.A., § 33-615; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 24, 25; 1985, ch. 437, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-6-201(c); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

This section is similar to former § 33-6-201(c).

33-6-605. Discharge of patient — Notice to court of discharge subject to outpatient treatment.

IF

the person does not request judicial review of the discharge plan, OR

the court approves an outpatient treatment plan after a hearing under § 33-6-604,

THEN

IF

the person is subject to judicial review under § 33-6-708,

THEN

the person shall be discharged in conformity with § 33-6-708, AND

IF

the person is not subject to judicial review under § 33-6-708,

THEN

the hospital shall discharge the person, AND

the hospital shall notify the committing court that the person has been discharged subject to the obligation to participate in the outpatient treatment.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 4; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 19, 20, 22; T.C.A., § 33-615; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 24, 25; 1985, ch. 437, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-6-201(d); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

This section is former § 33-6-201(d).

33-6-606. Amendment of outpatient treatment plan.

After discharge the qualified mental health professional may change the treatment plan to meet the person's treatment needs. If the qualified mental health professional changes the treatment plan, the person's obligation to participate in the treatment continues.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 4; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 19, 20, 22; T.C.A., § 33-615; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 24, 25; 1985, ch. 437, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-6-201(e); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

This section is similar to former § 33-6-201(e).

33-6-607. Payment for outpatient services.

If the person is indigent and is not eligible for payment for service under any other governmentally or privately funded system, the department shall provide for the outpatient services. The person is responsible for payment for the services, if:

The person is not indigent; or

The person is eligible for payment for services under any other governmentally or privately funded system.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 4; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 19, 20, 22; T.C.A., § 33-615; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 24, 25; 1985, ch. 437, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-6-201(f); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-608. Admission to treatment facility — Outpatient care suspended — Outpatient care reinstituted following release.

IF

a person who has been discharged subject to the obligation to participate in outpatient treatment is admitted to a hospital or treatment resource before the obligation terminates,

THEN

the obligation to participate in outpatient treatment is suspended, AND

the obligation resumes on discharge unless it has been terminated under § 33-6-620, § 33-6-622, or § 33-6-623 or the discharge is under § 33-6-706.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 4; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 19, 20, 22; T.C.A., § 33-615; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 24, 25; 1985, ch. 437, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-6-201(g); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-609. Failure to comply with outpatient treatment plan — Action to enforce.

IF

the parent, legal guardian, conservator, spouse, responsible relative, or qualified mental health professional of a service recipient who has been discharged subject to the obligation to participate in outpatient treatment, the person who initiated the commitment proceeding of the service recipient, or the chief officer of the discharging facility files an affidavit with the court that committed the service recipient or any court with jurisdiction under chapter 6, part 5, of this title in the county where the person is being treated or is staying showing that:

the person is required to be participating in outpatient treatment under § 33-6-602,

the person is, without good cause, out of compliance with the treatment plan, and

the qualified mental health professional believes the noncompliance is not likely to be corrected voluntarily,

THEN

the court shall have jurisdiction to conduct original proceedings to enforce the outpatient treatment obligation, AND

the court may order the person to appear before the court at a stated time not later than five (5) business days after the order is issued to determine whether the person is required by this part to be participating in the outpatient treatment and has failed, without good cause, to participate in the treatment as required, AND

the order and a copy of the affidavit shall be served immediately on the person, the qualified mental health professional, and, if the discharge was under § 33-6-708, the district attorney general for the jurisdiction in which the committing court is located.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 5; 1983, ch. 323, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-616; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 28-30; 1988, ch. 862, § 3; T.C.A., § 33-6-202; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 44.

33-6-610. Hearing to determine compliance — Findings — Order to comply — Recommitment upon failure or inability to comply.

If the person appears in person before the court, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether the person is required to be participating in outpatient treatment and is, without good cause, not complying with the treatment plan.

The court shall release the person, if the court determines that:

The person is complying with the treatment plan; or

The person is out of compliance for good cause and will be restored to compliance without further action.

If the court determines that the person is out of compliance with the treatment plan without good cause and that the person can be put immediately in compliance with the treatment plan and can be expected to stay in compliance without further hospitalization, the court shall make written findings of fact and conclusions of law on the issues, order the person to comply immediately with the treatment plan, and dismiss the proceedings upon a showing that the person is in compliance.

The court shall make written findings of fact and conclusions of law on the issues and order the person re-committed to the hospital from which the person was released, if the court determines that the person is out of compliance with the treatment plan without good cause and that:

The person cannot be put in compliance with the treatment plan immediately; or

The person cannot be expected to stay in compliance without further hospitalization.

The sheriff shall immediately transport the person as ordered, and the hospital shall admit the person and give notice of the recommitment to the person's attorney, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, and spouse or nearest adult relative, to the qualified mental health professional, to the committing court, and, if the discharge was under § 33-6-708, to the district attorney general in the committing jurisdiction.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 29; 1988, ch. 862, § 4; 1996, ch. 1079, § 64; T.C.A., § 33-6-203; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-611. Failure to appear at hearing — Custody order — Transportation to hospital — Admission — Notice to attorney or other representative.

IF

the qualified mental health professional has filed an affidavit showing that:

the person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance is required to be participating in outpatient treatment,

the person is, without good cause, not complying with the treatment plan, AND

the qualified mental health professional believes the noncompliance is not likely to be corrected voluntarily, AND

the person does not respond to the order to appear,

THEN

the court shall order the person taken into custody, AND

the sheriff shall immediately transport the person to the hospital from which the person was discharged, AND

the hospital shall admit the person and give notice of the temporary recommitment and that a hearing under § 33-6-610 will be held to the person's attorney, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, and spouse or nearest adult relative, to the qualified mental health professional, to the court that ordered the temporary recommitment of the person, and to the court where the hospital is located that has the same jurisdiction as the recommitting court.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 28; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 22-25; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 65, 66; T.C.A., § 33-6-204(a); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 5.

33-6-612. Failure to appear where no affidavit by qualified mental health professional.

IF

the qualified mental health professional has not filed an affidavit with the court regarding the person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, AND

the person does not respond to the order to appear,

THEN

the court shall order the person taken into custody, AND

the officer who serves the order on the person shall take the person to the qualified mental health professional or the professional's appointed substitute.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 28; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 22-25; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 65, 66; T.C.A., § 33-6-204(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-613. Substitution of qualified mental health professional.

A person's qualified mental health professional shall appoint a qualified mental health professional as a substitute in the absence of the appointing professional.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-614. Findings by qualified mental health professional — Release.

The qualified mental health professional shall release the person and notify the court of the basis for the release, if the qualified mental health professional determines that:

The person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance is in compliance with the treatment plan; or

The person is out of compliance for good cause, is put in compliance immediately, and can be expected to stay in compliance without further hospitalization.

The qualified mental health professional shall release the person and notify the court of the basis for the release, if the qualified mental health professional determines that:

The person is out of compliance with the treatment plan without good cause;

The person can be put in compliance with the treatment plan immediately;

The person complies immediately with the treatment plan; and

The person can be expected to stay in compliance without further hospitalization.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 28; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 22-25; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 65, 66; T.C.A., § 33-6-204(d); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-615. Findings by qualified mental health professional — Recommitment — Notice to representative, next of kin and court.

IF

the qualified mental health professional determines that:

the person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance is out of compliance with the treatment plan without good cause, and

the person cannot be put immediately in compliance with the treatment plan, or

the person cannot be expected to stay in compliance without further hospitalization, or

the person does not comply immediately with the treatment plan,

THEN

the qualified mental health professional shall contact the sheriff, AND

the sheriff shall immediately transport the person to the hospital from which the person was discharged, AND

the hospital shall admit the person and give notice of the temporary recommitment and that a hearing under § 33-6-610 will be held to the person, the person's attorney, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, and spouse or nearest adult relative, to the qualified mental health professional, to the court that ordered the temporary recommitment of the person, and to the court where the hospital is located that has the same jurisdiction as the recommitting court.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 28; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 22-25; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 65, 66; T.C.A., § 33-6-204(e); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-616. Recommitment hearing.

The court where the hospital is located is vested with jurisdiction to hold the hearing on a person returned under § 33-6-611. The court shall schedule a hearing to be held under § 33-6-610 within five (5) business days of receipt of the notice.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 28; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 22-25; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 65, 66; T.C.A., § 33-6-204(f); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 45.

33-6-617. Person eligible for discharge.

If the person, upon being readmitted under this part, is eligible for discharge under § 33-6-602, the person shall be discharged under § 33-6-602 notwithstanding § 33-3-501. The hospital shall give notice of the discharge to the courts that had been notified of the admission, and the judicial proceedings for recommitment shall be dismissed.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 28; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 22-25; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 65, 66; T.C.A., § 33-6-204(g); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-618. Rights of defendant in proceedings under this part.

In judicial proceedings under this part the person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance has the following rights:

The burden of proof to establish, as appropriate to the proceedings, that the outpatient treatment plan is proper, that the person is subject to return to the hospital, or that the plan is subject to extension, shall be by clear, unequivocal, and convincing evidence and shall be borne by the party seeking to impose the obligations;

The person shall be present at the hearing unless the person waives such presence in writing. If the person's attorney shows that the person's physical health would be endangered by being at the hearing, the court may order a continuance until the risk is terminated. If the court determines that the person's conduct at the hearing is so violent or otherwise disruptive that it creates a serious risk of harm to the person or others at the hearing or so disrupts the proceedings that they cannot be conducted in a proper manner, the court may order the person restrained or excluded to the extent necessary to the proper conduct of the proceedings. If the person is not present at or is excluded from the hearing, the court shall make a written fact finding as to why the hearing is held in the person's absence; and

The person's attorney shall notify the court of the representation immediately after accepting it. If the person does not employ an attorney, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the person as soon as possible after the case is docketed. An attorney representing the person shall not serve as guardian ad litem. If the court determines that the person is not able to understand the nature of the proceedings and cannot communicate with counsel in the conduct of the case, the court may appoint another person to serve as the person's guardian ad litem.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 31; T.C.A., § 33-6-205; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-619. Dismissal of proceedings pending against person recommitted under this part.

If a person is ordered to be rehospitalized for noncompliance with the treatment plan after a hearing under § 33-6-609, § 33-6-610 or § 33-6-611, upon readmission the person shall be held under the authority of the original court order of commitment entered in the proceedings under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, and any other pending proceedings under chapter 6, part 4 or 5 of this title shall be dismissed.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 32; T.C.A., § 33-6-206; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-620. Termination of legally mandated outpatient care — Notice to court.

IF

at any time the qualified mental health professional determines that:

the person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance is likely to participate in outpatient treatment without being legally obligated to do so, or

the person no longer needs treatment for the mental illness or serious emotional disturbance,

THEN

the qualified mental health professional shall terminate the treatment obligation, AND

the qualified mental health professional shall notify the committing court and the hospital that discharged the person.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 33-617, 33-6-203; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 26; T.C.A., § 33-6-207(a); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-621. Reinstatement of mandatory outpatient care.

IF

during the sixth month after discharge or after the last renewal the qualified mental health professional determines that:

the person has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance or has a mental illness or serious emotional disburbance in remission, AND

the person's condition resulting from mental illness or serious emotional disturbance is likely to deteriorate rapidly to the point that the person will pose a likelihood of serious harm under § 33-6-501 unless treatment is continued, AND

the person is not likely to participate in outpatient treatment unless legally obligated to do so, AND

mandatory outpatient treatment is a suitable less drastic alternative to commitment,

THEN

the obligation to participate in outpatient treatment is renewed for six (6) months, AND

the qualified mental health professional shall notify the person, the person's attorney, the hospital that discharged the person, and the committing court of the decision and of the basis for it and of the person's right to request a hearing in the committing court.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 33-617, 33-6-203; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 26; T.C.A., § 33-6-207(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-622. Hearing on reinstatement order.

If the person files a written request for a hearing with the committing court, within thirty (30) days after receipt of notice the committing court shall hold a hearing to review the decision of the qualified mental health professional. IF AND ONLY IF the court determines that:

The person has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance or has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance in remission,

The person's condition resulting from mental illness or serious emotional disturbance is likely to deteriorate rapidly to the point that the person will pose a likelihood of serious harm under § 33-6-501 unless treatment is continued,

The person is not likely to participate in outpatient treatment unless legally obligated to do so, AND

Mandatory outpatient treatment is a suitable less drastic alternative to commitment,

THEN

the obligation to participate in outpatient treatment is renewed for six (6) months.

IF, after a hearing, the court does not determine the obligation to participate in outpatient treatment to be renewed,

THEN the person is discharged from the outpatient treatment obligation.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 4; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 19, 20, 22; T.C.A., § 33-615; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 24, 25; 1985, ch. 437, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-6-201(c); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-623. Outpatient treatment obligation limited to six (6) months.

IF

a person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance is discharged subject to an outpatient treatment obligation under § 33-6-602, AND

the qualified mental health professional has not terminated the outpatient treatment obligation under § 33-6-620,

THEN

the person's obligation to participate in outpatient treatment terminates six (6) months after the discharge or the last renewal of the obligation.

Acts 1982, ch. 862, § 4; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 19, 20, 22; T.C.A., § 33-615; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 24, 25; 1985, ch. 437, § 21; T.C.A., § 33-6-201(d); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-624. Pilot program for patients to receive assisted outpatient treatment.

There shall be created a pilot project in Knox County, Tennessee, which shall expire on June 30, 2015, for a maximum of ten (10) patients at any given time to receive assisted outpatient treatment.

In addition to any authorized action under § 33-6-502, a court of competent jurisdiction may order a proposed patient to receive assisted outpatient treatment upon finding that the conditions of § 33-6-502(1)-(3) have been met.

Before ordering an outpatient treatment plan pursuant to this part, the court shall comply with subsections (c)-(f).

A proposed outpatient treatment plan, developed pursuant to this section by a physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) who has examined the proposed patient no more than ten (10) days prior to the entering of an order pursuant to this part, shall be presented to the court in writing. The plan shall include all services the examining physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) recommends that the proposed patient receive, and for each such recommended service, identify an appropriate community-based provider that has agreed to provide it.

lf the proposed outpatient treatment plan includes alcohol or substance abuse counseling and treatment, it may include a provision requiring relevant testing for either alcohol or illegal substances; provided, that the clinical basis of the physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) for recommending such plan provides sufficient facts for the court to find:

That such person has a history of alcohol or substance abuse that is clinically related to the mental illness; and

That such testing is necessary to prevent a relapse or deterioration which would be likely to result in serious harm to the person or others.

The examining physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) shall:

Provide an opportunity to actively participate in the development of the treatment plan to the proposed patient, the treating physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b), if any, and, upon the request of the proposed patient, any other individual significant to the proposed patient; and

Make reasonable efforts to gather information that may be relevant in the development of the treatment plan from the proposed patient's family or significant others.

At all stages of a proceeding commenced under this section, the proposed patient shall have the right to be represented by counsel. If neither the patient nor others provide counsel, the court shall appoint counsel for the proposed patient. Upon request of the proposed patient, the court shall order an independent examination by a physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) only when retained by the proposed patient.

Upon receipt of a petition for which assisted outpatient treatment may be an option, the court shall fix the date for a hearing. Such date shall be no later than ten (10) days from the date such petition is received by the court excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. Adjournments shall be permitted only for good cause shown. In granting adjournments, the court shall consider the need for further examination of the proposed patient and the potential need to provide assisted outpatient treatment expeditiously. The court shall cause the proposed patient, any other person to whom notice is due under this chapter, the petitioner, the physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) whose affirmation or affidavit accompanied the petition, and such other persons as the court may determine to be advised of such date. Upon such date, or upon such other date to which the proceeding may be adjourned, the court shall hear testimony and, if it is deemed advisable and the proposed patient is available, examine the proposed patient in or out of court. If the proposed patient does not appear at the hearing, and appropriate attempts to elicit the attendance of the proposed patient have failed, the court may conduct the hearing in the proposed patient's absence. In such case, the court shall set forth the factual basis for such determination.

If the affidavit or affirmation of the physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) accompanying the petition indicates that the proposed patient has not submitted to an examination in the ten (10) days prior to the filing of the petition, the court may request the proposed patient to submit to an examination by a physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) appointed by the court. If the proposed patient does not consent and the court finds reasonable cause to believe that the allegations in the petition are true, the court may order law enforcement officers to take the proposed patient into custody in accordance with § 33-6-618 and transport the patient to a hospital for examination by a physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b). Transportation will be conducted in accordance with parts 4 and 9 of this chapter. The subject may be detained for the period required to complete the examination, but not more than forty-eight (48) hours. The physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) whose affirmation or affidavit accompanied the petition may perform such examination of the proposed patient if the physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) is privileged or otherwise authorized by such hospital to do so. If such examination is performed by another physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b), the examining physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) may consult with the physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) whose affirmation or affidavit accompanied the petition as to whether the subject meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment. Upon completion of the examination, the subject shall be released and the examining physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) shall report the findings of the examination to the court. The court shall not hold a hearing on the petition unless and until the examining physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) submits to the court:

An affidavit or affirmation stating that the physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) concurs that the proposed patient meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment; and

A proposed assisted outpatient treatment plan for the proposed patient, developed by the examining physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b), and conforming to the requirements of subsection (c).

The court shall not order assisted outpatient treatment unless an examining physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) who has personally examined the proposed patient no more than ten (10) days before the filing of the petition and recommends assisted outpatient treatment, testifies at the hearing. Such physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) shall testify to:

The facts and clinical determinations that support the allegations that the proposed patient meets each of the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment; and

The proposed assisted outpatient treatment plan, the rationale for each component of such plan, and whether each such component is the least restrictive available alternative to serve the clinical needs of the proposed patient; and

A history of medication compliance.

The proposed patient shall be afforded an opportunity to present evidence, to call witnesses on the patient's behalf, and to cross-examine adverse witnesses.

Unless the proposed patient requests a public hearing, the hearing shall be confidential and a report of the proceedings shall not be released to the public or press.

If after hearing all relevant evidence, the court does not find by clear and convincing evidence that the proposed patient meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment, the court shall not order outpatient treatment under this section and shall order inpatient care and treatment under § 33-6-502 or make other dispositions as authorized by law.

If after hearing all relevant evidence, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the proposed patient meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment, the court may order the proposed patient to receive assisted outpatient treatment for an initial period not to exceed six (6) months. In fashioning the order, the court shall specifically make findings by clear and convincing evidence that the ordered treatment is the least restrictive treatment appropriate and feasible for the proposed patient, and that community resources and a willing treatment provider are available to support such treatment. The order shall state an assisted outpatient treatment plan, which shall include all categories of assisted outpatient treatment that the proposed patient is to receive, but shall not include any such category that has not been recommended in both the proposed written treatment plan and the testimony provided to the court.

If after hearing all relevant evidence, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the proposed patient meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment and that the treatment recommended by the examining physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) is in whole or in part appropriate, but the court does not find by clear and convincing evidence that community resources and a willing treatment provider are available to provide such treatment, the court shall state such findings of fact on the record and deny assisted outpatient treatment without prejudice and may order such other treatment or commitment as authorized by law.

The petitioner shall cause a copy of any court order issued pursuant to this section to be served personally, or by mail, facsimile or electronic means, upon the assisted outpatient and all service providers identified in the treatment plan.

In addition to any other right or remedy available by law with respect to the order for assisted outpatient treatment, either party to the order may apply to the court, on notice to the other party and all others entitled to notice, to stay, vacate, or modify the order.

The treatment provider may modify the treatment plan according to the treatment needs of the assisted outpatient and provide notice to the court and petitioner.

Within thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of an order for assisted outpatient treatment, the original applicant, if the petitioner retains the status of an authorized petitioner pursuant to this chapter, or, in the absence of a timely petition by the original petitioner, any other person authorized to petition pursuant to this chapter, may apply to the court to order continued assisted outpatient treatment and the court may order continued assisted outpatient treatment for a period not to exceed six (6) months from the expiration date of the current order if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the assisted outpatient treatment continues to meet the criteria in this part. If the court's disposition of such petition does not occur prior to the expiration date of the current order, the current order shall remain in effect for up to an additional thirty (30) days without further action of the court. If the court's disposition of such petition does not occur within thirty (30) days after the expiration date of the current order, the order for assisted outpatient treatment shall terminate. The procedures for obtaining any order pursuant to this subsection (i) shall be in accordance with this section.

Section 33-6-607 shall apply to the costs incurred for services ordered under this section.

An assisted outpatient's substantial failure to comply with the order of the court shall constitute reason for a physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) to determine whether the assisted outpatient is subject to emergency detention under § 33-6-401, and shall give rise to the authority under § 33-6-402 for such physician or a professional designated under § 33-6-427(a) or (b) to take custody of the assisted outpatient. Failure to comply with an order of assisted outpatient treatment shall not be grounds for a finding of contempt of court or for non-emergency involuntary detention under this title. Nothing in this section precludes the use of detention by law enforcement officers under § 33-6-402.

The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services is authorized to promulgate rules to implement this section in accordance with the Uniform Administration Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 575, § 2; 2012, ch. 1060, § 1; 2014, ch. 1000, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.